lexicon/transformations/isoglosses.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>

@U.TL.ON@  ! "t"s realized as "tl"
@P.TL.ON@
@U.T.ON@
@P.T.ON@

LEXICON Root
WordInitVow ;
Cns ;
Vow ;


LEXICON Loop
Cns ;
Vow ;
 #  ;


LEXICON WordInitVow
e:ye Loop ;


LEXICON Vow
i:i Loop ;
e:e Loop ;

!
! e/i alternation
!
e:i Loop ;
i:e Loop ;

a:a Loop ;
o:o Loop ;
u:u Loop ;

ē:e%: Loop ;
ī:i%: Loop ;
ā:a%: Loop ;
ō:o%: Loop ;


LEXICON Cns
b:b Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
k:k Loop ;
kʷ:kw Vow ;
kʷ: wk Cns ;
kʷ:wk # ;
t͡ʃ:ch Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
j:j Loop ;
w:w Loop ;

!
! t-tl alternation
!
@U.TL.ON@ɬ:@U.TL.ON@tl Loop ;
@U.TL.ON@t:@U.TL.ON@tl Loop ;
@U.T.ON@t:@U.T.ON@t Loop ;
@U.T.ON@ɬ:@U.T.ON@t Loop ;

m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
n:0 # ;
p:p Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
ʃ:x Loop ;
y:y Vow ;
l:l Loop ;
